District of Columbia statutes.
47-2108

Jurisdiction of Superior Court to enjoin violations of this chapter.

Upon complaint of any person, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall have jurisdiction in equity to restrain and enjoin any act forbidden or declared illegal by any provisions of this chapter.

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 451, Pub. L. 86-219, § 8
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 573, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(53)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2108.
1973 Ed., § 47-3008.